North Dakota statutes. TITLE 45 Partnerships
CHAPTER 45-10.2 Uniform Limited Partnership Act
45-10.2-96.
Plan of conversion approval and amendment.

If the converting organization is a limited partnership, then:

Subject to section 45-10.2-104, a plan of conversion must be consented to by all of the partners of a converting limited partnership.

Subject to section 45-10.2-104 and any contractual rights, after a conversion is approved, and at any time before the effective date of the plan, a converting limited partnership may amend the planned conversion:

As provided in the plan; and

Except as provided otherwise by the plan, by the same consent as was required to approve the plan.

If the converting organization is not a limited partnership, then the approval and the amendment of the plan of conversion must comply with its governing statute in effecting the conversion.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-97.
Articles of conversion.

Upon receiving the approval required by section 45-10.2-96, articles of conversion must be prepared in a record that must contain:

A statement that the converting organization is being converted into another organization, including:

The name of the converting organization immediately before the filing of the articles of conversion;

The name to which the name of the converting organization is to be changed, which must be a name that satisfies the laws applicable to the converted organization;

The form of organization that the converted organization will be; and

The jurisdiction of the governing statute of the converted organization;

A statement that the plan of conversion has been approved by the converting organization as provided in section 45-10.2-96;

A statement that the plan of conversion has been approved as required by the governing statute of the converted organization;

The plan of conversion without the organizational records;

A copy of the originating record of the converted organization; and

If the converted organization is a foreign organization not authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state, then the street and mailing address of an office which the secretary of state may use for the purposes of subsection 4 of section 45-10.2-99.

The articles of conversion must be signed on behalf of the converting organization and filed with the secretary of state.

If the converted organization is a domestic organization, then:

The filing of the articles of conversion must also include the filing with the secretary of state of the originating record of the converted organization.

Upon both the articles of conversion and the originating record of the converted organization being filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of conversion and the appropriate certificate of creation to the converted organization or its legal representative.

If the converted organization is a foreign organization:

That is transacting business or conducting activities in this state, then:

The filing of the articles of conversion must include the filing with the secretary of state of an application for a certificate of authority by the converted organization.

Upon both the articles of conversion and the application for a certificate of authority by the converted organization being filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of conversion and the appropriate certificate of authority to the converted organization or the legal representative.

That is not transacting business or conducting activities in this state, then upon the articles of conversion being filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of conversion to the converted organization or its legal representative.

A converting organization that is the owner of a service mark, trademark, or trade name, is a general partner named in a fictitious name certificate, or is a general partner in a limited partnership that is on file with the secretary of state must change or amend the name of the converting organization to the name of the converted organization in each registration when filing the articles of conversion.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2009, ch. 106, § 66.

45-10.2-98.
Abandonment of conversion.

If the articles of conversion have not been filed with the secretary of state, and:

If the converting organization is a limited partnership, then subject to section 45-10.2-104 and any contractual rights, after a conversion is approved, and at any time before the effective date of the plan, a converting limited partnership may abandon the planned conversion:

As provided in the plan; and

Except as provided otherwise by the plan, by the same consent as was required to approve the plan.

If the converting organization is not a limited partnership, then the abandonment of the plan of conversion must comply with its governing statute.

If articles of conversion have been filed with the secretary of state, but have not yet become effective, then the converting organization shall file with the secretary of state articles of abandonment that contain:

The name of the converting organization;

The provision of this section under which the plan is abandoned; and

If the plan is abandoned:

By the consent of all of the partners, then the text of the resolution abandoning the plan; or

As provided in the plan, then a statement that the plan provides for abandonment and that all conditions for abandonment set forth in the plan are met.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-99.
Effective date of conversion — Effect.

A conversion is effective when the filing requirements of subsection 2 of section 45-10.2-97 have been fulfilled or on a later date specified in the articles of conversion.

With respect to the effect of conversion on the converting organization and on the converted organization:

An organization that has been converted as provided in sections 45-10.2-94 through 45-10.2-99 is for all purposes the same entity that existed before the conversion.

Upon a conversion becoming effective:

If the converted organization:

Is a limited partnership, then the converted organization has all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers, and is subject to all the duties and liabilities, of a limited partnership formed under this chapter; or

Is not a limited partnership, then the converted organization has all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers, and is subject to the duties and liabilities as provided in its governing statute;

All property owned by the converting organization remains vested in the converted organization;

All debts, liabilities, and other obligations of the converting organization continue as obligations of the converted organization;

An action or proceeding pending by or against the converting organization may be continued as if the conversion had not occurred;

Except as otherwise provided by other law, all rights, privileges, immunities, and powers of the converting organization remain vested in the converted organization;

Except as otherwise provided in the plan of conversion, the terms and conditions of the plan of conversion take effect; and

Except as otherwise agreed, the conversion does not dissolve a converting limited partnership for the purposes of sections 45-10.2-66 through 45-10.2-75.

When a conversion becomes effective, each ownership interest in the converting organization is deemed to be converted into ownership interests in the converted organization or, in whole or in part, into money or other property to be received under the plan.

A converted organization that is a foreign organization consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to enforce any obligations owed by the converting limited partnership, if before the conversion the converting limited partnership was subject to suit in this state on the obligation. A converted organization that is a foreign organization and not authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of process for purposes of enforcing an obligation under this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-100. (1106)
Merger.

A limited partnership may merge with one or more other constituent organizations pursuant to this section and sections 45-10.2-101 through 45-10.2-103 and a plan of merger, if:

The governing statute of each of the other organizations authorizes the merger;

The merger is not prohibited by the law of a jurisdiction that enacted any of those governing statutes; and

Each of the other organizations complies with its governing statute in effecting the merger.

For the purposes of sections 45-10.2-100 through 45-10.2-103, “originating record” means for an organization that is:

A corporation, its articles of incorporation;

A limited liability company, its articles of organization;

A limited partnership, its certificate of limited partnership;

A limited liability partnership, its registration; and

A limited liability limited partnership, its certificate of limited liability limited partnership.

A plan of merger must be in a record and must include:

The name and form of each constituent organization;

The name and form of the surviving organization and:

If the surviving organization is to be created by the merger, then:

A statement to that effect; and

Its organizational record; or

If the surviving organization is not to be created by the merger, then any amendments to be made to the organizational record of the surviving organization;

The terms and conditions of the merger;

The manner and basis for converting the interests in each constituent organization into any combination of money, interests in the surviving organization, and other consideration; and

Any other provisions with respect to the proposed merger that are deemed to be necessary or desirable.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-101. (1107)
Plan of merger approval — Amendment and abandonment.

Subject to section 45-10.2-104, a plan of merger must be consented to by all the partners of a constituent limited partnership.

Subject to section 45-10.2-104 and any contractual rights, after a merger is approved, and at any time before a filing is made under section 45-10.2-102, a constituent limited partnership may amend the plan or abandon the planned merger:

As provided in the plan; and

Except as prohibited by the plan, with the same consent as was required to approve the plan.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-102. (1108)
Articles of merger.

After each constituent organization has approved a merger, articles of merger must be signed on behalf of:

Each pre-existing constituent limited partnership, by each general partner listed in the certificate of limited partnership; and

Each other pre-existing constituent organization, by an authorized representative.

The articles of merger must be accompanied by the plan of merger without organizational records and must include:

With respect to each constituent organization:

Its name;

Its form;

The jurisdiction of its governing statute;

A statement that the merger complies with its governing statute; and

Any additional information required by the governing statute of any constituent organization.

With respect to the surviving organization:

Its name;

Its form;

The jurisdiction of its governing statute;

The date the merger is effective under its governing statute;

If it is created by the merger, then:

A statement to that effect; and

The originating record that creates the organization;

If it pre-exists the merger, then any amendments to its originating record provided for in the plan of merger; or

If it is a foreign organization not authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state, then the street and mailing address of an office that the secretary of state may use for the purposes of subsection 2 of section 45-10.2-103.

The articles of merger must be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

A merger becomes effective under this chapter:

If the surviving organization is a limited partnership, upon the later of:

Compliance with subsection 3; or

Subject to subsection 3 of section 45-10.2-27, as specified in the articles of merger; or

If the surviving organization is not a limited partnership, then as provided by the governing statute of the surviving organization.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-103. (1109)
Effect of merger.

When a merger becomes effective:

The surviving organization continues or comes into existence;

Each constituent organization that merges into the surviving organization ceases to exist as a separate entity;

All property owned by each constituent organization that ceases to exist vests in the surviving organization;

All debts, liabilities, and other obligations of each constituent organization that ceases to exist continue as obligations of the surviving organization;

An action or proceeding pending by or against any constituent organization that ceases to exist may be continued by the surviving organization as if the merger had not occurred;

Except as prohibited by other law, all of the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of each constituent organization that ceases to exist vest in the surviving organization;

Except as otherwise provided in the plan of merger, the terms and conditions of the plan of merger take effect;

Except as otherwise agreed, if a constituent limited partnership ceases to exist, then the merger does not dissolve the limited partnership for the purposes of sections 45-10.2-66 through 45-10.2-75;

If the surviving organization is created by the merger and:

If it is a limited partnership, then the certificate of limited partnership becomes effective; or

If it is an organization other than a limited partnership, then the organizational record that creates the organization becomes effective; and

If the surviving organization pre-exists the merger, then any amendments provided for in the articles of merger for the organizational record that created the organization become effective.

A surviving organization that is a foreign organization consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to enforce any obligation owed by a constituent organization, if before the merger the constituent organization was subject to suit in this state on the obligation. A surviving organization that is a foreign organization and not authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of process for the purposes of enforcing an obligation under this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-104. (1110)
Restrictions on approval of conversions and mergers and on relinquishing limited liability limited partnership status.

If a partner of a converting or constituent limited partnership will have personal liability with respect to a converted or surviving organization, then approval and amendment of a plan of conversion or merger are ineffective without the consent of the partner, unless:

The partnership agreement of the limited partnership provides for the approval of the conversion or merger with the consent of fewer than all the partners; and

The partner has consented to the provision of the partnership agreement.

An amendment to a certificate of limited partnership which converts the limited partnership to a limited liability limited partnership is ineffective without the consent of each general partner unless:

The partnership agreement of the limited partnership provides for the conversion with the consent of less than all the general partners; and

Each general partner that does not consent to the amendment of conversion has consented to that provision of the partnership agreement.

A partner does not give the consent required by subsection 1 or 2 merely by consenting to a provision of the partnership agreement which permits the partnership agreement to be amended with the consent of fewer than all the partners.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-105. (1111)
Liability of general partner after conversion or merger.

A conversion or merger under this chapter does not discharge any liability under sections 45-10.2-40 and 45-10.2-61 of a person that was a general partner in or dissociated as a general partner from a converting or constituent limited partnership, but:

The provisions of this chapter pertaining to the collection or discharge of the liability continue to apply to the liability;

For the purposes of applying those provisions, the converted or surviving organization is deemed to be the converting or constituent limited partnership; and

If a person is required to pay any amount under this subsection, then:

The person has a right of contribution from each other person that was liable as a general partner under section 45-10.2-40 when the obligation was incurred and has not been released from the obligation under section 45-10.2-61; and

The contribution due from each of those persons is in proportion to the right to receive distributions in the capacity of general partner in effect for each of those persons when the obligations were incurred.

In addition to any other liability provided by law:

A person that immediately before a conversion or merger became effective was a general partner in a converting or constituent limited partnership that was not a limited liability limited partnership is personally liable for each obligation of the converted or surviving organization arising from a transaction with a third party after the conversion or merger becomes effective, if, at the time the third party enters into the transaction, the third party:

Does not have notice of the conversion or merger; and

Reasonably believes that:

The converted or surviving organization or business is the converting or constituent limited partnership;

The converting or constituent limited partnership is not a limited liability limited partnership; and

The person is a general partner in the converting or constituent limited partnership; and

A person that was dissociated as a general partner from a converting or constituent limited partnership before the conversion or merger became effective is personally liable for each obligation of the converted or surviving organization arising from a transaction with a third party after the conversion or merger becomes effective, if:

Immediately before the conversion or merger became effective the converting or surviving limited partnership was not a limited liability limited partnership; and

At the time the third party enters into the transaction less than two years have passed since the person dissociated as a general partner and the third party:

Does not have notice of the dissociation;

Does not have notice of the conversion or merger; and

Reasonably believes that:

The converted or surviving organization or business is the converting or constituent limited partnership;

The converting or constituent limited partnership is not a limited liability limited partnership; and

The person is a general partner in the converting or constituent limited partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-106. (1112)
Power of general partners and persons dissociated as general partners to bind organization after conversion or merger.

An act of a person that immediately before a conversion or merger became effective was a general partner in a converting or constituent limited partnership binds the converted or surviving organization after the conversion or merger becomes effective, if:

Before the conversion or merger became effective, the act would have bound the converting or constituent limited partnership under section 45-10.2-38; and

At the time the third party enters into the transaction, the third party:

Does not have notice of the conversion or merger; and

Reasonably believes that:

The converted or surviving organization or business is the converting or constituent limited partnership; and

The person is a general partner in the converting or constituent limited partnership.

An act of a person that before a conversion or merger became effective was dissociated as a general partner from a converting or constituent limited partnership binds the converted or surviving organization after the conversion or merger becomes effective, if:

Before the conversion or merger became effective, the act would have bound the converting or constituent limited partnership under section 45-10.2-38 if the person had been a general partner; and

At the time the third party enters into the transaction, less than two years have passed since the person dissociated as a general partner and the third party:

Does not have notice of the dissociation;

Does not have notice of the conversion or merger; and

Reasonably believes that:

The converted or surviving organization or business is the converting or constituent limited partnership; and

The person is a general partner in the converting or constituent limited partnership.

If a person having knowledge of the conversion or merger causes a converted or surviving organization to incur an obligation under subsection 1 or 2, then the person is liable:

To the converted or surviving organization for any damage caused to the organization arising from the obligation; and

If another person is liable for the obligation, then to that other person for any damage caused to that other person arising from the liability.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-107.
Service of process on a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership and on nonresident general partners.

Any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the limited partnership, foreign limited partnership, or general partner may be served as provided in section 10-01.1-13.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2007, ch. 99, § 66.

45-10.2-108.
Secretary of state — Annual report of limited partnership and foreign limited partnership.

Each limited partnership, and each foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this state, shall file, within the time provided by subsection 3, an annual report setting forth:

The name of the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership and the jurisdiction of origin.

The address of the registered office of the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership in this state and the name of the registered agent of the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership in this state at that address.

The address of the principal executive office of the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership.

A brief statement of the character of the business in which the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership is actually engaged in this state.

The name and respective address of every general partner of the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership.

The annual report must be submitted on forms prescribed by the secretary of state. The information provided in the annual report must be accurate as of the time of filing the report. The annual report must be signed as provided in subsection 40 of section 45-10.2-02 or a resolution approved by the affirmative vote of the required proportion or number of partners. If the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, the annual report must be signed on behalf of the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership by the receiver or trustee. The secretary of state may destroy any annual reports provided for in this section after the annual report is on file for six years.

Except for the first annual report, the annual report of a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership must be delivered to the secretary of state before April first of each year. The first annual report of a limited partnership must be delivered before April first of the year following the calendar year of the effective date of the limited partnership certificate and the first annual report of a foreign limited partnership must be delivered before April first of the year following the calendar year in which the certificate of authority was filed by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall file the report if the report conforms to the requirements of subsection 2.

If the report does not conform, then the report must be returned to the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership for any necessary corrections.

If the report is filed before the deadlines provided in this subsection, then penalties for the failure to file a report within the time provided do not apply if the report is corrected to conform to the requirements of subsection 2 and returned to the secretary of state within thirty days after the annual report was returned by the secretary of state for correction.

After the date established under subsection 3, the secretary of state shall notify any limited partnership or foreign limited partnership failing to file an annual report that the certificate of limited partnership or certificate of authority of a foreign limited partnership is not in good standing and that the certificate of the limited partnership or the certificate of authority of the foreign limited partnership may be dissolved or revoked pursuant to subsection 5.

The secretary of state must mail notice of dissolution or revocation to the last registered agent at the last registered office.

If the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership files an annual report after the notice is mailed, then the secretary of state will restore the certificate or certificate of authority of the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership to good standing.

A limited partnership that does not file an annual report, within six months after the date established in subsection 3, ceases to exist and is considered involuntarily dissolved by operation of law.

The secretary of state shall note the dissolution of the certificate of limited partnership on the records of the secretary of state and shall give notice of the action to the dissolved limited partnership.

Notice by the secretary of state must be mailed to the last registered agent at the last registered office of the limited partnership.

A foreign limited partnership that does not file an annual report, within six months after the date established by subsection 3, forfeits the right to transact business in this state.

The secretary of state shall note the revocation of the certificate of authority of the foreign limited partnership on the records of the secretary of state and shall give notice of the action to the foreign limited partnership.

Notice by the secretary of state must be mailed to the last registered agent at the last registered office of the foreign limited partnership.

A limited partnership that is dissolved for failure to file an annual report, or a certificate of authority of a foreign limited partnership that is forfeited for failure to file an annual report, may be reinstated by filing a past-due report, together with the statutory filing and penalty fees for an annual report and a reinstatement fee as provided in section 45-10.2-109. The fees must be paid and the report filed within one year following the involuntary dissolution or revocation. Reinstatement under this subsection does not affect the rights or liability for the time from the dissolution or revocation to the reinstatement.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2007, ch. 99, § 67; 2019, ch. 92, § 15, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 85, § 20, effective August 1, 2021.

45-10.2-108.1.
Secretary of state — Involuntary dissolution — Revocation of certificate of authority.

With respect to involuntary dissolution of a limited partnership by the secretary of state:

A limited partnership may be involuntarily dissolved by the secretary of state if:

The limited partnership has failed to appoint and maintain a registered agent and registered office as provided in section 45-10.2-17; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the limited partnership under this chapter.

A limited partnership may not be dissolved by the secretary of state as provided for in this section unless:

The secretary of state has given the limited partnership not less than sixty days’ notice by mail addressed to its registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the limited partnership does not maintain a registered agent in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal office; and

During the sixty-day period, the limited partnership has failed to:

File the report of change as provided in chapter 10-01.1 regarding the registered office or the registered agent;

File any other required record; or

Correct the misrepresentation.

Upon expiration of sixty days after the mailing of the notice, the existence of the limited partnership ceases. The secretary of state shall issue a notice of dissolution and shall mail the notice addressed to its registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the limited partnership does not maintain a registered agent in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal office.

With respect to the revocation of a certificate of authority of a foreign limited partnership by the secretary of state:

The certificate of authority of a foreign limited partnership to transact business in this state may be revoked by the secretary of state if:

The foreign limited partnership has failed to:

Appoint and maintain a registered agent and registered office as provided in section 45-10.2-82;

Maintain the registration of a general partner as required in section 45-10.2-16;

File a report upon any change in the address of its principal executive office;

File with the secretary of state any amendment to its application for a certificate of authority as provided in section 45-10.2-81;

File with the secretary of state any merger as provided in section 45-10.2-83; or

File with the secretary of state an application for cancellation of its authority as provided in section 45-10.2-85 when the foreign limited partnership’s existence has expired or the foreign limited partnership has been dissolved in the jurisdiction of the foreign limited partnership; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the foreign limited partnership under this chapter.

A certificate of authority may not be revoked by the secretary of state as provided for in this section unless:

The secretary of state has given the foreign limited partnership not less than sixty days’ notice by mail addressed to its registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the limited partnership failed to maintain a registered agent in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal office; and

During the sixty-day period, the foreign limited partnership has failed to:

File the report of change as provided in chapter 10-01.1 regarding the registered office or the registered agent;

Maintain the registration of a general partner as required in section 45-10.2-16;

File a report upon any change in the address of its principal executive office;

File any amendment;

File any merger;

File an application for cancellation;

File any other required record; or

Correct the misrepresentation.

Upon expiration of sixty days after the mailing of the notice, the authority of the foreign limited partnership to transact business in this state ceases. The secretary of state shall issue a notice of revocation and shall mail the notice to the registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the foreign limited partnership failed to maintain a registered agent in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal office.

If the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership files a report of change relating to the registered agent or any other required record or correction of a misrepresentation after the notice with the fee provided for in section 45-10.2-109, the secretary of state shall restore the certificate of authority to good standing. Until restored to good standing, the secretary of state may not accept for filing any document respecting the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership except those incident to its dissolution or cancellation.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 86, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

45-10.2-109.
Secretary of state — Fees for filing records. [Contingent effective date – See note]

The secretary of state shall charge and collect for:

Filing a certificate of limited partnership, one hundred ten dollars.

Filing a limited partnership amendment, forty dollars.

Filing articles of conversion of a limited partnership, fifty dollars and:

If the organization resulting from the conversion will be a domestic organization governed by the laws of this state, then the fees provided by the governing laws to establish or register a new organization like the organization resulting from the conversion; or

If the organization resulting from the conversion will be a foreign organization that will transact business in this state, then the fees provided by the governing laws to obtain a certificate of authority or register an organization like the organization resulting from the conversion.

Filing abandonment of conversion, fifty dollars.

Filing limited partnership articles of merger, fifty dollars.

Filing abandonment of merger or exchange, fifty dollars.

Filing a limited partnership statement of correction, forty dollars.

Filing a limited partnership dissolution, twenty-five dollars.

Filing a limited partnership cancellation, twenty-five dollars.

Filing a reservation of name, ten dollars.

Filing a notice of transfer of a reserved limited partnership name, ten dollars.

Filing a cancellation of a reserved limited partnership name, ten dollars.

Filing a consent to use a name, ten dollars.

Filing a statement of change of address of registered office or change of registered agent, or both, or a change of address of registered office by registered agent, the fee provided by section 10-01.1-03.

Filing a certificate of authority of foreign limited partnership, one hundred ten dollars.

Filing a certified statement of amendment of foreign limited partnership, forty dollars.

Filing a certified statement of dissolution of foreign limited partnership, twenty-five dollars.

Filing a certified statement of cancellation of foreign limited partnership, twenty-five dollars.

Filing a certified statement of merger of foreign limited partnership, fifty dollars.

Filing a certified statement of conversion of foreign limited partnership, fifty dollars and:

If the organization resulting from the conversion will be a domestic organization governed by the laws of this state, then the fees provided by the governing laws to establish or register a new organization like the organization resulting from the conversion; or

If the organization resulting from the conversion will be a foreign organization that will transact business in this state, then the fees provided by the governing laws to obtain a certificate of authority or register an organization like the organization resulting from the conversion.

Filing a statement of withdrawal of foreign limited partnership, twenty-five dollars.

Filing an annual report of a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership, twenty-five dollars.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect additional fees for late filing of an annual report as follows:

After the date provided in subsection 3 of section 45-10.2-108, twenty dollars; and

After the dissolution of the limited partnership or the revocation of the certificate of authority of a foreign limited partnership, the reinstatement fee of one hundred dollars.

Fees paid to the secretary of state according to this subsection are not refundable if an annual report submitted to the secretary of state cannot be filed because it lacks information required by section 45-10.2-108, or the annual report lacks sufficient payment as required by this subsection.

Any record submitted for approval before the actual time of submission for filing, one-half of the fee provided in this section for filing the record.

Filing any process, notice, or demand for service, the fee provided in section 10-01.1-03.

Furnishing a certificate of existence or authorization:

Fifteen dollars; and

Five dollars for a search of records.

Furnishing a certified copy of any record, or paper relating to a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership:

The fee provided in section 54-09-04 for copying a record;

Fifteen dollars for the certificate and affixing the seal thereto; and

Five dollars for a search of records.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2007, ch. 99, § 68; 2009, ch. 106, § 67; 2011, ch. 87, § 66; contingently amended by 2019, ch. 93, § 10.

Note.

This section is effective upon receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the secretary of state attesting that all necessary administrative rules and information technology components and systems are ready for implementation of this Act.

45-10.2-110.
Secretary of state — Duties.

The secretary of state shall maintain an alphabetical index of all limited partnerships and foreign limited partnerships on file with that office. All records filed with the secretary of state under this chapter must be retained in that office until the records have been committed to microcopy, at which time the records may be destroyed.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.